Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 22. Enterprise Zone Act.

§§ 59.1-270,
59.1-271.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

These sections were enacted by Acts 1982, c. 275 and expired July 1, 2005, pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 792 and § 59.1-284.01.

§§ 59.1-272 through 59.1-278.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

§ 59.1-279.
Eligibility.

Any business firm may be designated a “qualified business firm” for purposes of this chapter if:

It establishes within an enterprise zone a trade or business not previously conducted in the Commonwealth by such taxpayer and (ii) 25 percent or more of the employees employed at the business firm’s establishment or establishments located within the
enterprise zone either have incomes below 80 percent of the median income for the jurisdiction prior to employment or are residents of an enterprise zone. 1. (i) It establishes within an enterprise zone a trade
or business not previously conducted in the Commonwealth by such taxpayer and (ii) 25 percent or more of the employees employed at the business firm’s establishment or establishments located within the enterprise
zone either have incomes below 80 percent of the median income for the jurisdiction prior to employment or are residents of an enterprise zone.

It (i) is actively engaged in the conduct of a trade or business in an area immediately prior to such an area being designated as an enterprise zone and (ii) increases the average number of full-time employees employed at the business firm’s establishment
or establishments located within the enterprise zone by at least 10 percent over the lower of the preceding two years’ employment with no less than 25 percent of such increase being employees who either have incomes below
80 percent of the median income for the jurisdiction prior to employment or are residents of an enterprise zone. Current employees of the business firm that are transferred directly to the enterprise zone facility from
another site within the state resulting in a net loss of employment at that site shall not be included in calculating the increase in the average number of full-time employees employed by the business firm within the enterprise
zone.

It (i) is actively engaged in the conduct of a trade or business in the Commonwealth and relocates to begin operation of a trade or business within an enterprise zone and (ii) increases the average number of full-time employees employed at the business
firm’s establishment or establishments within the enterprise zone by at least ten percent over the lower of the preceding two years’ employment of the business firm prior to relocation with no less than 25 percent of such
increase being employees who either have incomes below eighty percent of the median income for the jurisdiction prior to employment or are residents of an enterprise zone. Current employees of the business firm that are
transferred directly to the enterprise zone facility from another site within the state resulting in a net loss of employment at that site shall not be included in calculating the increase in the average number of full-time
employees employed by the business firm within the enterprise zone.

For the purposes of this section, the term “full-time employee” means (i) an individual employed by a business firm and who works the normal number of hours a week as required by the firm or (ii) two or more individuals who together share the same job
position and together work the normal number of hours a week as required by the business firm for that one position. For the purposes of this section, the term “jurisdiction” means the county, city or town which made the
application under § 59.1-274 to have the enterprise zone. In the case of a joint application, jurisdiction means all parties making such application.

After designation as a qualified business firm pursuant to this section, each business firm in an enterprise zone shall submit annually to the Department a statement requesting one or more of the tax incentives provided in § 59.1-280 or 59.1-282. Such
a statement shall be accompanied by an approved form supplied by the Department and completed by an independent certified public accountant licensed by the Commonwealth which states that the business firm met the definition of
a “qualified business firm” and continues to meet the requirements for eligibility as a qualified business firm in effect at the time of its designation. A copy of the statement submitted by each business firm to the Department
shall be forwarded to the zone administrator.

The form referred to in subsection B of this section, prepared by an independent certified public accountant licensed by the Commonwealth, shall be prima facie evidence of the eligibility of a business firm for the purposes of this section, but the evidence
of eligibility shall be subject to rebuttal. The Department or the Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission, as applicable, may at its discretion require any business firm to provide supplemental information regarding
the firm’s eligibility (i) as a qualified business firm or (ii) for a tax credit claimed pursuant to this chapter.

The provisions of this section shall apply only as follows:

To those qualified business firms that have initiated use of enterprise zone tax credits pursuant to this section on or before July 1, 2005;

To those small qualified business firms and large qualified business firms that have signed agreements with the Commonwealth regarding the use of enterprise zone tax credits in accordance with this section on or before July 1, 2005; provided that in the
case of small qualified business firms, the signed agreements must be based on proposals developed by the Commonwealth prior to November 1, 2004.

History.
1982, c. 275; 1983, c. 572; 1988, cc. 236, 374; 1995, c. 792; 1997, cc. 497, 517, 808; 2005, cc. 863, 884.

Cross references.

As to the expiration provision for this chapter, see § 59.1-284.01.

As to regulation of the Enterprise Zone Grant Program by the Department of Housing and Community Development, see 13 VAC 5-112-10 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Sections 59.1-274 and 59.1-282, referred to in subdivision A 4 and subsection B, respectively, were repealed effective July 1, 2005, by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 863 and 884 are identical, and substituted “25 percent” for “twenty-five percent” in subdivisions A 1, A 2 and A 3, “80 percent” for “eighty percent” in subdivisions A 1 and A 2, “10 percent” for “ten percent” in subdivision
A 2, added subdivision D and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 59.1-279.1.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

§ 59.1-280.
Enterprise zone business tax credit.

As used in this section:“Business tax credit” means a credit against any tax due under Articles 2 (§

58.1-320

et seq.) and 10 (§

58.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 3, Chapter 12 (§

58.1-1200

et seq.), Article 1 (§

58.1-2500

et seq.) of Chapter 25, or Article 2 (§

58.1-2620

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 58.1 due from a business firm.“Large qualified business firm” means a qualified business firm making qualified zone investments in excess of $15 million when such qualified zone investments
result in the creation of at least 50 permanent full-time positions. “Qualified zone investment” and “permanent full-time position” shall have the meanings provided in subsection A of § 59.1-280.1.“Small qualified business firm”
means any qualified business firm other than a large qualified business firm.

The Department shall certify annually to the Commissioner of the Department of Taxation, or in the case of business firms subject to tax under Article 2 (§

58.1-2620

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 58.1 to the Director of Public Service Taxation for the State Corporation Commission, the applicability of the business tax credit provided herein for a qualified business firm. Any
certification by the Department pursuant to this section shall not impair the authority of the Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission to deny in whole or in part any claimed tax credit if the Department of Taxation
or State Corporation Commission determines that the qualified business firm is not entitled to such tax credit. The Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission shall notify the Department in writing upon determining
that a business firm is ineligible for such tax credit.

Small qualified business firms shall be allowed a business tax credit in an amount equal to 80 percent of the tax due to the Commonwealth for the first tax year and 60 percent of the tax due the Commonwealth for the second tax year through the tenth tax
year.

Large qualified business firms shall be allowed a business tax credit in a percentage amount determined by agreement between the Department and the large qualified business firm, provided such percentage amounts shall not exceed the percentages provided
for small qualified business firms as set forth in subsection C.

Any business tax credit not usable may not be applied to future tax years.

When a partnership or a small business corporation making an election pursuant to Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code is eligible for a tax credit under this section, each partner or shareholder shall be eligible for the tax credit provided for
in this section on his individual income tax in proportion to the amount of income received by that partner from the partnership, or shareholder from his corporation, respectively.

Tax credits provided for in this section shall only apply to taxable income of a qualified business firm attributable to the conduct of business within the enterprise zone. Any qualified business firm having taxable income from business activity both
within and without the enterprise zone shall allocate and apportion its Virginia taxable income attributable to the conduct of business as follows:

The portion of a qualified business firm’s Virginia taxable income allocated and apportioned to business activities within an enterprise zone shall be determined by multiplying its Virginia taxable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum
of the property factor and the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is two.

The property factor is a fraction. The numerator is the average value of real and tangible personal property of the business firm which is used in the enterprise zone. The denominator is the average value of real and tangible personal property of the
business firm used everywhere in the Commonwealth.

The payroll factor is a fraction. The numerator is the total amount paid or accrued within the enterprise zone during the taxable period by the business firm for compensation. The denominator is the total compensation paid or accrued everywhere in the
Commonwealth during the taxable period by the business firm for compensation.

Tax credits awarded under this section and under § 59.1-280.1 shall not exceed $7.5 million annually until the end of fiscal year 2019.

The provisions of this section shall apply only as follows:

To those qualified business firms that have initiated use of enterprise zone tax credits pursuant to this section on or before July 1, 2005;

To those small qualified business firms and large qualified business firms that have signed agreements with the Commonwealth regarding the use of enterprise zone tax credits in accordance with this section on or before July 1, 2005; provided that in the
case of small qualified business firms, the signed agreements must be based on proposals developed by the Commonwealth prior to November 1, 2004.

2. The property factor and the payroll factor shall be determined in accordance with the procedures established in §§

58.1-409

through

58.1-413

for determining the Virginia taxable income of a corporation having income from business activities which is taxable both within and without the Commonwealth, mutatis mutandis.

3.
If a qualified business firm believes that the method of allocation and apportionment hereinbefore prescribed as administered has operated or will operate to allocate or apportion to an enterprise zone a lesser portion of
its Virginia taxable income than is reasonably attributable to business conducted within the enterprise zone, it shall be entitled to file with the Department of Taxation a statement of its objections and of such alternative method
of allocation or apportionment as it believes to be appropriate under the circumstances with such detail and proof and within such time as the Department of Taxation may reasonably prescribe. If the Department of Taxation concludes
that the method of allocation or apportionment employed is in fact inequitable or inapplicable, it shall redetermine the taxable income by such other method of allocation or apportionment as best seems calculated to assign to an enterprise
zone the portion of the qualified business firm’s Virginia taxable income reasonably attributable to business conducted within the enterprise zone.

History.
1982, c. 275; 1983, c. 572; 1988, c. 236; 1992, c. 301; 1995, c. 792; 1996, c. 77; 1997, c. 517; 1998, c. 759; 2003, c. 676; 2005, cc. 863, 884; 2009, cc. 207, 271; 2011, c. 850.

Cross references.

As to the expiration provision for this chapter, see § 59.1-284.01.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 301, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1995, c. 792, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to qualified business firms which begin operations within an enterprise zone on or after July 1, 1992, or which are first designated
as qualified business firms on or after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 676, in subsection A, added the paragraph defining “High investment/limited job creation qualified business firm”; in the paragraph defining “Large qualified business firm,” substituted “50” for “fifty”; and in the paragraph defining
“Small qualified business firm,” added “or a high investment/limited job creation qualified business firm”; in subsection C, substituted “80” for “eighty” and “60” for “sixty”; in the second sentence of subsection D, inserted present
clause (ii), redesignated former clause (ii) as present clause (iii), and substituted “$3 million” for “three million dollars”; inserted present subsection E; and redesignated former subsections E through G as present subsections F
through H.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 863 and 884 are identical, and deleted the last sentence in subsection C relating to “tax credits granted to small business firms and qualified zone residents,” deleted the last sentence in subsection D relating to “tax credits
granted to large business firms, high investment/limited job creation and large qualified zone residents,” deleted the last sentence in subsection F relating to “tax credits granted for qualified business firms prior to July 1, 1995”
and added subsections I and J.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 207 and 271 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted the paragraph defining “High investment/limited job creation qualified business firm” and “or a high investment/limited job creation qualified business firm” at the end
of the paragraph defining “Small qualified business firm”; deleted subsection E; and redesignated former subsections F through J as subsections E through I.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 850, effective for the taxable year commencing on or after January 1, 2013, deleted “(i) business firms subject to tax under Article 1 (§

58.1-2500

et seq.) of Chapter 25 of Title 58.1 to the Commissioner of Insurance for the State Corporation Commission, or (ii)” following “or in the case of” in the first sentence in subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article, “Taxation,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1221 (1997).

For survey article on developments in the law affecting Virginia taxation, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (2003).

§ 59.1-280.1.
Enterprise zone real property investment tax credit.

As used in this section:“Large qualified zone resident” means a qualified zone resident making qualified zone investments in excess of $100 million when such qualified zone investments result in the creation of at least 200 permanent full-time positions.“Permanent
full-time position” means a job of an indefinite duration at a business firm located within an enterprise zone requiring the employee to report for work within the enterprise zone, and requiring either (i) a minimum of 35 hours
of an employee’s time a week for the entire normal year of the business firm’s operations, which “normal year” must consist of at least 48 weeks, (ii) a minimum of 35 hours of an employee’s time a week for the portion of the taxable
year in which the employee was initially hired for, or transferred to, the business firm, or (iii) a minimum of 1,680 hours per year if the standard fringe benefits are paid by the business firm for the employee. Seasonal or temporary
positions, or a position created when a job function is shifted from an existing location in the Commonwealth to a business firm located within an enterprise zone shall not qualify as permanent full-time positions.“Qualified zone
improvements” means the amount expended for improvements to rehabilitate or expand depreciable real property placed in service during the taxable year within an enterprise zone, provided that the total amount of such improvements
equals or exceeds (i) $50,000 and (ii) the assessed value of the original facility immediately prior to the rehabilitation or expansion. “Qualified zone expenditures” includes any such expenditure regardless of whether it is considered
properly chargeable to a capital account or deductible as a business expense under federal Treasury Regulations.Qualified zone improvements include expenditures associated with any exterior, structural, mechanical, or electrical
improvements necessary to expand or rehabilitate a building for commercial or industrial use and excavations, grading, paving, driveways, roads, sidewalks, landscaping, or other land improvements. Qualified zone improvements shall
include, but not be limited to, costs associated with demolition, carpentry, sheetrock, plaster, painting, ceilings, fixtures, doors, windows, fire suppression systems, roofing and flashing, exterior repair, cleaning, and cleanup.Qualified
zone improvements shall not include:

The cost of acquiring any real property or building; however, the cost of any newly constructed depreciable nonresidential real property (excluding land, land improvements, paving, grading, driveways, and interest) shall be considered to be a qualified
zone improvement eligible for the credit if the total amount of such expenditure is at least $250,000 with respect to a single facility.

The cost of furnishings; (ii) any expenditure associated with appraisal, architectural, engineering and interior design fees; (iii) loan fees, points, or capitalized interest; (iv) legal, accounting, realtor, sales and marketing, or other professional
fees; (v) closing costs, permits, user fees, zoning fees, impact fees, and inspection fees; (vi) bids, insurance, signage, utilities, bonding, copying, rent loss, or temporary facilities incurred during construction;
(vii) utility hook-up or access fees; (viii) outbuildings; or (ix) the cost of any well or septic or sewer system. 2. (i) The cost of furnishings; (ii) any expenditure associated with appraisal, architectural, engineering
and interior design fees; (iii) loan fees, points, or capitalized interest; (iv) legal, accounting, realtor, sales and marketing, or other professional fees; (v) closing costs, permits, user fees, zoning fees, impact
fees, and inspection fees; (vi) bids, insurance, signage, utilities, bonding, copying, rent loss, or temporary facilities incurred during construction; (vii) utility hook-up or access fees; (viii) outbuildings;
or (ix) the cost of any well or septic or sewer system.

The basis of any property: (i) for which a credit under this section was previously granted; (ii) which was previously placed in service in Virginia by the taxpayer, a related party as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 267 (b), or a trade or business
under common control as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 52 (b); or (iii) which was previously in service in Virginia and has a basis in the hands of the person acquiring it, determined in whole or in part by reference
to the basis of such property in the hands of the person from whom acquired or Internal Revenue Code § 1014 (a).“Qualified zone investments” means the sum of qualified zone improvements and the cost of machinery, tools
and equipment used in manufacturing tangible personal property within an enterprise zone. For purposes of this section, machinery, tools and equipment shall only be deemed to include the cost of such property which is placed
in service in the enterprise zone on or after July 1, 1995. Machinery, tools and equipment shall not include the basis of any property: (i) for which a credit under this section was previously granted; (ii) which was previously
placed in service in Virginia by the taxpayer, a related party as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 267 (b), or a trade or business under common control as defined by Internal Revenue Code § 52 (b); or (iii) which was
previously in service in Virginia and has a basis in the hands of the person acquiring it, determined in whole or part by reference to the basis of such property in the hands of the person from whom acquired, or Internal
Revenue Code § 1014 (a).“Qualified zone resident” means an owner or tenant of real property located in an enterprise zone who expands or rehabilitates such real property to facilitate the conduct of a trade or business
within the enterprise zone.“Real property investment tax credit” means a credit against the taxes imposed by Articles 2 (§

58.1-320

et seq.) and 10 (§

58.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 3, Chapter 12 (§

58.1-1200

et seq.), Article 1 (§

58.1-2500

et seq.) of Chapter 25, or Article 2 (§

58.1-2620

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 58.1.“Small qualified zone resident” means any qualified zone resident other than a large qualified zone resident.

For all taxable years beginning on and after July 1, 1995, but before July 1, 2005, a qualified zone resident shall be allowed a real property investment tax credit as set forth in this section.

For any small qualified zone resident, a real property investment tax credit shall be allowed in an amount equaling 30 percent of the qualified zone improvements. Any tax credit granted pursuant to this subsection is refundable; however, in no event shall
the cumulative credit allowed to a small qualified zone resident pursuant to this subsection exceed $125,000 in any five-year period.

For any large qualified zone resident, a real property investment tax credit shall be allowed in an amount of up to five percent of such qualified zone investments. The percentage amount of the real property investment tax credit granted to a large qualified
zone resident shall be determined by agreement between the Department and the large qualified zone resident, provided such percentage amount shall not exceed five percent. The real property investment tax credit provided by this
subsection shall not exceed the tax imposed for such taxable year, but any credit not usable for the taxable year generated may be carried over until the full amount of such credit has been utilized.

The Department shall certify the nature and amount of qualified zone improvements and qualified zone investments eligible for a real property investment tax credit in any taxable year. Only qualified zone improvements and qualified zone investments that
have been properly certified shall be eligible for the credit. Any form filed with the Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission for the purpose of claiming the credit shall be accompanied by a copy of the certification
furnished to the taxpayer by the Department. Any certification by the Department pursuant to this section shall not impair the authority of the Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission to deny in whole or in part
any claimed tax credit if the Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission determines that the taxpayer is not entitled to such tax credit. The Department of Taxation or State Corporation Commission shall notify the Department
in writing upon determining that a taxpayer is ineligible for such tax credit.

In the case of a partnership, limited liability company or S corporation, the term “qualified zone resident” as used in this section means the partnership, limited liability company or S corporation. Credits granted to a partnership, limited liability
company or S corporation shall be passed through to the partners, members or shareholders, respectively.

The Tax Commissioner shall have the authority to issue regulations relating to the computation and carryover of the credit provided under this section.

In the first taxable year only, the credit provided in this section shall be prorated equally against the taxpayer’s estimated payments made in the third and fourth quarters and the final payment, if such taxpayer is required to make quarterly payments.

Tax credits awarded under this section and under § 59.1-280 shall not exceed $7.5 million annually until the end of fiscal year 2019.

The provisions of this section shall apply only as follows:

To those large qualified zone residents that have initiated use of enterprise zone tax credits pursuant to this section on or before July 1, 2005;

To those large qualified zone residents that have signed agreements with the Commonwealth regarding the use of enterprise zone tax credits in accordance with this section on or before July 1, 2005.

History.
1995, c. 792; 1997, cc. 517, 634, 669; 1998, c. 759; 2005, cc. 863, 884; 2017, c. 451.

Cross references.

As to the expiration provision for this chapter, see § 59.1-284.01.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 863 and 884 are identical, and deleted “by such owner or tenant” preceding “within” in the paragraph defining “Qualified zone resident,” deleted the last sentence in subsection C relating to “tax credits granted to small qualified
zone residents and business firms,” deleted the former third sentence in subsection D relating to “tax credits granted to large qualified zone residents and business firms,” added subsections I and J and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 451, in the definition of “Qualified zone improvements” in subsection A, substituted “expended” for “properly chargeable to a capital account” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 59.1-280.2.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

§ 59.1-281.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 572.

§ 59.1-282.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

§§ 59.1-282.1,
59.1-282.2.

Repealed by Acts 2009, cc. 207 and 271, cl. 3.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 59.1-282.1 and 59.1-282.2, pertaining to grants for creating permanent full-time positions, eligibility, and the Enterprise Zone Grant Fund, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 792; 1997, cc. 634, 669; 2005, cc. 863, 884.

§§ 59.1-282.3 through 59.1-284.

Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 2.

§ 59.1-284.01.
Expiration of chapter; exceptions.

All provisions of this chapter except §§ 59.1-279, 59.1-280, 59.1-280.1, 59.1-282.1, 59.1-282.2 and this section shall expire on July 1, 2005, unless extended by an act of the General Assembly.

All enterprise zones designated pursuant to §§ 59.1-274, 59.1-274.1, and 59.1-274.2 as those were in effect prior to July 1, 2005 shall continue in effect until the end of their 20-year designation period. Such zones shall be governed by the provisions
of Chapter 49 (§ 59.1-538 et seq.).

History.
1995, c. 792; 2005, cc. 863, 884.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Subsection A of this section refers to §§ 59.1-282.1 and 59.1-282.2, which were repealed by Acts 2009, cc. 207 and 271, cl. 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 863 and 884 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted the A designation at the beginning, “except §§ 59.1-279, 59.1-280, 59.1-280.1, 59.1-282.1, 59.1-282.2 and this section,” added subsection B and made a minor stylistic
change.